utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4751 Y 1
SFX 4751 0 тиравте .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 ираново .
SFX 1847 Y 1
SFX 1847 0 лете .
SFX 4296 Y 1
SFX 4296 0 лети .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 вост .
SFX 3048 Y 1
SFX 3048 0 еруваат .
SFX 4534 Y 1
SFX 4534 0 ислав .
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 0 телка .
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 0 денски .
SFX 4914 Y 1
SFX 4914 0 иштво .
SFX 2212 Y 1
SFX 2212 0 реден .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 ника .
SFX 4213 Y 1
SFX 4213 0 ажниот .
SFX 3969 Y 1
SFX 3969 0 моски .
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 0 егнете .
SFX 4147 Y 1
SFX 4147 0 арскине .
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 0 вината .
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 0 љубив .
SFX 4424 Y 1
SFX 4424 0 азуваат .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 јана .
SFX 2303 Y 1
SFX 2303 0 јани .
SFX 3529 Y 1
SFX 3529 0 жното .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 јувале .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 ера .
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 0 увачкиот .
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 0 ере .
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 0 ери .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 жевте .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 рирање .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 авата .
SFX 1349 Y 1
SFX 1349 0 иновска .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 иновски .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 ичново .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 внава .
SFX 1127 Y 1
SFX 1127 0 ичар .
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 0 ичат .
SFX 4325 Y 1
SFX 4325 0 ател .
SFX 1919 Y 1
SFX 1919 0 атен .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 тирањето .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 шкиве .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 виме .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 ор .
SFX 630 Y 1
SFX 630 0 ос .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 от .
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 0 ош .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 ој .
SFX 3688 Y 1
SFX 3688 0 мината .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 ула .
SFX 3367 Y 1
SFX 3367 0 уле .
SFX 1328 Y 1
SFX 1328 0 ули .
SFX 4994 Y 1
SFX 4994 0 днат .
SFX 2037 Y 1
SFX 2037 0 еста .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 0 ести .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 алнава .
SFX 2235 Y 1
SFX 2235 0 есто .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 инине .
SFX 3665 Y 1
SFX 3665 0 шувате .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 овниот .
SFX 4952 Y 1
SFX 4952 0 тења .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 тење .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 жија .
SFX 1835 Y 1
SFX 1835 0 екува .
SFX 4527 Y 1
SFX 4527 0 личен .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 тиве .
SFX 1401 Y 1
SFX 1401 0 нар .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 нат .
SFX 4384 Y 1
SFX 4384 0 изирајќи .
SFX 3477 Y 1
SFX 3477 0 иноска .
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 0 иноски .
SFX 1078 Y 1
SFX 1078 0 натиов .
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 0 натион .
SFX 4076 Y 1
SFX 4076 0 ору .
SFX 3159 Y 1
SFX 3159 0 отот .
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 0 тениов .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 тенион .
SFX 2967 Y 1
SFX 2967 0 ерија .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 0 ача .
SFX 1815 Y 1
SFX 1815 0 аче .
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 ачи .
SFX 1721 Y 1
SFX 1721 0 рнава .
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 0 сниве .
SFX 2149 Y 1
SFX 2149 0 лина .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 лине .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 лини .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 рена .
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 0 рени .
SFX 1965 Y 1
SFX 1965 0 рено .
SFX 1872 Y 1
SFX 1872 0 чениов .
SFX 1871 Y 1
SFX 1871 0 ченион .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 киот .
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 0 вноно .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 доа .
SFX 613 Y 1
SFX 613 0 дов .
SFX 2051 Y 1
SFX 2051 0 дон .
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 0 гар .
SFX 3612 Y 1
SFX 3612 0 гаш .
SFX 1848 Y 1
SFX 1848 0 каме .
SFX 1964 Y 1
SFX 1964 0 чест .
SFX 3747 Y 1
SFX 3747 0 адеше .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 орниот .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 тичкиве .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 0 ливото .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 ност .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 утка .
SFX 1115 Y 1
SFX 1115 0 ичкана .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 алноно .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 са .
SFX 1563 Y 1
SFX 1563 0 се .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 си .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 0 ск .
SFX 2439 Y 1
SFX 2439 0 со .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 укува .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 0 дувате .
SFX 1625 Y 1
SFX 1625 0 чноста .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 ањено .
SFX 3358 Y 1
SFX 3358 0 ашка .
SFX 4996 Y 1
SFX 4996 0 ашки .
SFX 3933 Y 1
SFX 3933 0 ализам .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 истите .
SFX 2344 Y 1
SFX 2344 0 аев .
SFX 3614 Y 1
SFX 3614 0 аел .
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 0 аен .
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 0 лувавте .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 аната .
SFX 2659 Y 1
SFX 2659 0 дувањата .
SFX 4626 Y 1
SFX 4626 0 деме .
SFX 2869 Y 1
SFX 2869 0 риев .
SFX 1256 Y 1
SFX 1256 0 дете .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 риел .
SFX 4020 Y 1
SFX 4020 0 риен .
SFX 4394 Y 1
SFX 4394 0 тирајќи .
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 0 ниме .
SFX 2500 Y 1
SFX 2500 0 гање .
SFX 1903 Y 1
SFX 1903 0 тица .
SFX 3154 Y 1
SFX 3154 0 тици .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 0 вува .
SFX 4893 Y 1
SFX 4893 0 певте .
SFX 1420 Y 1
SFX 1420 0 овци .
SFX 3328 Y 1
SFX 3328 0 пнат .
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 0 фор .
SFX 569 Y 1
SFX 569 0 ета .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 ете .
SFX 588 Y 1
SFX 588 0 ети .
SFX 467 Y 1
SFX 467 0 ето .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 реново .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 струва .
SFX 1703 Y 1
SFX 1703 0 ичнине .
SFX 3657 Y 1
SFX 3657 0 ивноста .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 лизмот .
SFX 3675 Y 1
SFX 3675 0 сираат .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 виов .
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 0 вион .
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 0 терот .
SFX 4586 Y 1
SFX 4586 0 орче .
SFX 3704 Y 1
SFX 3704 0 анкине .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 вањана .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 уна .
SFX 3176 Y 1
SFX 3176 0 уни .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 бана .
SFX 4444 Y 1
SFX 4444 0 олниот .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 ерат .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 ечеа .
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 0 ечев .
SFX 2318 Y 1
SFX 2318 0 ечел .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 ечен .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 лева .
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 0 леви .
SFX 4946 Y 1
SFX 4946 0 шова .
SFX 4564 Y 1
SFX 4564 0 шови .
SFX 2561 Y 1
SFX 2561 0 ителот .
SFX 3869 Y 1
SFX 3869 0 жувањено .
SFX 3860 Y 1
SFX 3860 0 чуваната .
SFX 2329 Y 1
SFX 2329 0 рет .
SFX 1497 Y 1
SFX 1497 0 рец .
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 0 стичките .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 жела .
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 0 желе .
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 0 жело .
SFX 3097 Y 1
SFX 3097 0 арност .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 анскиот .
SFX 4728 Y 1
SFX 4728 0 жуваната .
SFX 3978 Y 1
SFX 3978 0 жново .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 еав .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 0 еал .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 еам .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 еан .
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 0 ишува .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 пувањата .
SFX 4263 Y 1
SFX 4263 0 авава .
SFX 4608 Y 1
SFX 4608 0 илна .
SFX 4302 Y 1
SFX 4302 0 илни .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 илно .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 ливиот .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 ивањето .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 чињава .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 0 орија .
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 0 водниот .
SFX 4690 Y 1
SFX 4690 0 тирањево .
SFX 3204 Y 1
SFX 3204 0 сувајте .
SFX 3199 Y 1
SFX 3199 0 џилница .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 ореа .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 орев .
SFX 4287 Y 1
SFX 4287 0 орел .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 орен .
SFX 4535 Y 1
SFX 4535 0 ипува .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 атана .
SFX 4756 Y 1
SFX 4756 0 оруваше .
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 0 ивното .
SFX 4606 Y 1
SFX 4606 0 ишат .
SFX 3311 Y 1
SFX 3311 0 ачиња .
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 0 рчување .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 шете .
SFX 4295 Y 1
SFX 4295 0 мира .
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 0 ирала .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 ирале .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 ирало .
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 0 лист .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 иското .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 тична .
SFX 2585 Y 1
SFX 2585 0 тични .
SFX 2210 Y 1
SFX 2210 0 тично .
SFX 4181 Y 1
SFX 4181 0 ничари .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 анчев .
SFX 1066 Y 1
SFX 1066 0 ванине .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 0 тскиот .
SFX 1417 Y 1
SFX 1417 0 вност .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 шнана .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 лче .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 пете .
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 0 шаната .
SFX 911 Y 1
SFX 911 0 нското .
SFX 4912 Y 1
SFX 4912 0 мичка .
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 0 ув .
SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 0 уд .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 уз .
SFX 2255 Y 1
SFX 2255 0 ук .
SFX 2115 Y 1
SFX 2115 0 ул .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 0 ум .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 ун .
SFX 4901 Y 1
SFX 4901 0 овоно .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 олуваат .
SFX 4433 Y 1
SFX 4433 0 цијана .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 бите .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 зираат .
SFX 2046 Y 1
SFX 2046 0 пов .
SFX 4643 Y 1
SFX 4643 0 пон .
SFX 3961 Y 1
SFX 3961 0 твото .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 нува .
SFX 4832 Y 1
SFX 4832 0 изираш .
SFX 4252 Y 1
SFX 4252 0 зниов .
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 0 знион .
SFX 4831 Y 1
SFX 4831 0 изирај .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 ази .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 0 рувањана .
