utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
доб/2,30,80,107,108,121,131,158,218,266,334,427,452,566,629,739,881,949,1384,1398,1554,1606,1635,1834,2041,2301,2340,2344,2360,2403,2423,2427,2431,2613,2623,2717,3048,3145,3343,3556,3614,3812,3841,3885,3986,3989,3996,4047,4048,4062,4070,4101,4632,4651
жир/3,9,14,81,87,88,89,93,95,218,352,391,502,549,853,1278,1318,1355,1364,1502,1861,3809,4821
одб/9,452,550,568,629,664,697,723,803,808,838,1229,1250,1328,1384,1461,1554,1558,2310,2340,2623,2626,2748,2805,2845,3266,3303,3304,3305,3306,3307,3308,3343,3344,3347,3358,3633,3634,3676,3986,4028,4047,4048,4076,4346,4513,4515,4574,4577,4584
нена/1577,1738,2039,2212,2472,3766,4755
бони/1595,3194
рост/2772,4534
конт/288,290,429,719,723,880,1419,1602,1850,1929,1989,2597,2755,3610,3767,4576,4809
замо/293,395,523,795,1051,1243,1308,1329,1363,1370,1608,1651,1684,1745,1847,1909,2005,2108,2198,2314,2315,2559,2618,2689,2727,2728,2800,2801,2990,3066,3067,3068,3069,3070,3071,3072,3073,3181,3291,3292,3578,3782,4602
прит/334,681,1200,1301,1328,1835,1859,1990,2184,2344,2361,3171,3378,3614,3841,4301,4352,4632
пост/366,576,1085,1122,1141,1654,2032,2167,2309,2423,2430,2431,2626,2717,2748,2749,2805,2845,3051,3171,3266,3303,3304,3305,3306,3307,3308,3345,3347,3604,3634,3676,3987,3989,4141,4290,4317,4318,4346,4574
проп/378,452,550,553,568,697,798,907,1086,1342,1554,1617,1791,1834,1919,2081,2340,2623,2700,2746,2983,3048,3343,3783,3798,3832,3986,4016,4047,4048,4058,4325,4451,4511
кадр/42,43,44,45,486,512,917,921,922,926,951,1049,1102,1132,1163,1185,1322,1420,1550,1607,1655,1862,2301,2357,2412,2772,2810,2850,2994,3210,3726,3751,3752,3847,4123,4260,4263,4455,4605,4829,4938
трил/44,452,1016,1073,4244,4301
бота/494,614,1210,1408,1592,1593,1785,1830,2182,3212,3213,3214,3215,4125,4181,4401,4402,4403,4404
анти/5,46,50,83,98,100,103,104,105,153,167,172,192,285,303,313,327,329,349,360,367,380,488,489,492,493,594,596,612,618,662,810,995,1042,1043,1044,1045,1443,1466,1473,1551,1863,1963,2024,2146,2177,2332,3969
дост/556,747,844,1122,1123,1238,1252,1265,1278,1349,1606,1654,2167,2431,2626,2748,2749,3263,3276,3477,3604,4118
меша/767,1145,2629,4212
пота/776,843,1022,1994,2248,2643,2715,2754,2891,3012,3132,3529,3620,3977,3978,3979,3980,3981,3982,3983,3984,4078,4493
гори/864,989,1107,1174,1285,1312,1954,1955,1956,1957,1958,1959,1960,1961,2781
запро/1298,1584,1985,2327,2611,2644,3157,3561,3723,3724,4296
колен/1812,1982,2235,4035
атлет/3,21,24,29,138,144,149,157,186,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,284,375,840,1127,1239,1356,1529,1787,2074,2753,2773,3079,3735,4537,4538
јазич/337,486,755,881,1749,1895,1976,2477,2478,3405,4143,4144,4145,4146,4147,4148,4149,4150,4479,4480
сонце/4490
подло/48,50,78,263,396,562,609,694,960,1215,1289,1314,1316,1547,1641,1928,1994,2035,2086,2087,2095,2096,2248,2491,2628,2754,2898,3374,3581,3831,4043,4308,4542,4986
приши/7,10,19,22,31,32,33,37,40,54,59,61,70,80,102,143,152,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,184,188,196,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,331,342,414,430,457,678,1020,1490,1535,1690,1761,1936,1997,2000,2889,3386,4748,4796,4797,4878
малов/753,1554,2740,3699,4213
домин/869,1291,1538,1919,3096,3809,4934
управи/1,15,17,59,309,333,416,420,693,778,1081,1295,1319,2188,3201
харков/1891,2303
процес/2,3,5,6,8,14,20,21,26,28,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,70,89,93,110,209,294,296,350,391,473,509,518,549,615,616,629,686,702,716,725,754,777,784,806,822,852,868,897,912,913,925,933,937,950,953,956,962,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981,982,1005,1006,1007,1008,1073,1229,1250
штрајк/2,6,81,89,94,101,111,216,217,219,225,232,261,485,522,692,706,1317,1341,1457,2287,2917,4375,4863
хармон/24,93,350,375,391,530,583,645,765,779,807,811,1015,1047,1122,1179,1230,1239,1385,1386,1507,1529,1537,1542,1567,1699,1700,1701,1702,1703,1704,1705,1706,1760,3030,4457
митров/50,97,103,148,443,531,4851
никола/73,107,108,121,131,290,630,2519,2654,2908
тронта/85,812,1193,1398
трезвен/3,9,23,69,91,198,262,284,304,4914
инвестици/3,21,24,26,28,29,43,59,138,144,149,157,186,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,433,870,902,1180,1290,1446,1784,4518,4519
